test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-askihkw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - askihkw - ok : # -m animate noun, Canada goose
     askihkw+N+AN+Sg: askihkw
     askihkw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitaskihkom
     askihkw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitaskihkom
     askihkw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otaskihkoma
     askihkw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otaskihkomiyiwa
     askihkw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitaskihkominân
     askihkw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitaskihkominaw
     askihkw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitaskihkomiwâw
     askihkw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otaskihkomiwâwa
     askihkw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otaskihkomiyiwa

     askihkw+N+AN+Pl: askihkwak
     askihkw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitaskihkomak
     askihkw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitaskihkomak
     askihkw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otaskihkoma
     askihkw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otaskihkomiyiwa
     askihkw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitaskihkominânak
     askihkw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitaskihkominawak
     askihkw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitaskihkomiwâwak
     askihkw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otaskihkomiwâwa
     askihkw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otaskihkomiyiwa

     askihkw+N+AN+Obv: askihkwa
     askihkw+N+AN+Loc: askihkohk
     askihkw+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitaskihkomihk
     askihkw+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitaskihkomihk
     askihkw+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otaskihkomihk
     askihkw+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otaskihkomiyihk
     askihkw+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitaskihkominâhk
     askihkw+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitaskihkominâhk
     askihkw+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitaskihkomiwâhk
     askihkw+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otaskihkomiwâhk
     askihkw+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otaskihkomiyihk

     askihkw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: askihkos
     askihkw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: askihkosak
     askihkw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [askihkosihk, askihkosinâhk]
     askihkw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicaskihkos
     askihkw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicaskihkos
     askihkw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocaskihkosa
     askihkw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ocaskihkosiyiwa
